Wisconsin, session 2025, AB795.
do enact as follows:AB795,11Section 1. 115.28 (7) (i) of the statutes is created to read:AB795,2,42115.28 (7) (i) Maintain on the department’s website an online licensing portal 3that allows the public to search and access license information by name and license 4number at no cost and includes all of the following:AB795,2,651. The name of each license holder who is under investigation under s. 115.31 6(6) or s. PI 34.100, Wis. Adm. Code.AB795,2,1072. If a license holder is investigated under s. 115.31 (6) or s. PI 34.100, Wis. 8Adm. Code., the outcome of the investigation, including if an investigation was 9terminated because the license holder voluntarily surrendered the license during 10the investigation.AB795,2,11113. The name of each individual whose license is revoked by the department.AB795,212Section 2. 115.31 (6) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB795,2,2013115.31 (6) (b) Upon receiving a report under sub. (3) relating to a person 14licensed by the state superintendent, the state superintendent shall investigate to 15determine whether to initiate revocation proceedings. The state superintendent 16shall post on the department’s Internet site include in the online licensing portal 17under s. 115.28 (7) (i) the name of the licensee who is under investigation. During 18the investigation the state superintendent shall keep confidential all information 19pertaining to the investigation except the fact that an investigation is being 20conducted and the date of the revocation hearing.AB795,321Section 3. 115.31 (6) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB795,3,522115.31 (6) (c) The department shall maintain a record of all investigations 1conducted under par. (b) that indicates the name of the licensee, the date the 2investigation began, the reason for the investigation, and the result of the 3investigation. Whenever an investigation results in the revocation of a license, the 4department shall post on its Internet site include in the online licensing portal 5under s. 115.28 (7) (i) the name of the person whose license was revoked.AB795,3,66